tests/kik.lexd
#!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!
#!!!                          L E X I C O N                                  !!!
#!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!

LEXICON NounLocative
<loc>:inĩ
<loc>:-inĩ
:

LEXICON NounRootCl1
ndũ:nd{Ũ}  # person
arimũ:arim{Ũ}  # teacher
rĩmi:{R}ĩm{I}  # farmer
timia:{T}imi{A}  # woman
tumia:{T}umi{A}  # woman, alternate spelling
nyina:nyin{A}  # mother
thomi:thom{I}  # student
thuri:thur{I}  # man
arĩ:{A}r{Ĩ}  # daughter

LEXICON NounRootCl1Irr
wagui:wagu{I}

LEXICON Cl1
<n><cl1>:{NULL}

LEXICON NounRootCl3
aki:{A}k{I}  # fire
ithikiri:{I}thikir{I}  # bicycle
bira:bir{A}  # ball
rango:rang{O}  # door
ciĩ:{C}i{Ĩ}  # home
tĩ:{T}{Ĩ}  # tree
cuha:{C}uh{A}  # swing
rũthi:{R}ũth{I}  # lion
thanga:thang{A}  # sand
ĩkĩre:{Ĩ}kĩr{E}  # method
thenya:theny{A}  # day; also gap
gũnda:gũnd{A}  # garden
gambĩre:gambĩre  # voice

LEXICON Cl3
<n><cl3>:{NULL}

LEXICON NounRootCl5
hũa:hũ{A}  # flower
tunda:{T}und{A}  # fruit
rima:{R}im{A}  # hole
ria:{R}i{A}  # milk, or lake/pond
bera:ber{A}  # pear
gũrũ:gũr{Ũ}  # sky
aĩ:{BLOCK}{A}{BLOCK}{Ĩ}  # water
higa:hig{A}  # stone
embe:{E}mb{E}  # mango
rigũ:{R}ig{Ũ}  # banana
inabu:{I}nab{U}
ĩciria:{Ĩ}ciri{A}
taha:{T}ah{A}  # mataha (a food made with corn and beans!)
thangũ:thang{Ũ}  # leaf
mithimithi:mithimith{I}  # twilight, always plural
twa:{T}w{A}  # name
thaga:thag{A}  #
itho:{I}th{O}  # eye
rwa:{R}w{A}  # letter

LEXICON Cl5
<n><cl5>:{NULL}

LEXICON NounRootCl7
rĩma:{R}ĩm{A}  # mountain
tĩ:{T}{Ĩ}  # chair
rio:{R}i{O}  # food
kombe:{K}omb{E}  # cup
ũra:{Ũ}r{A}  # frog
rot:{R}ot  # dream
rathi:{R}ath{A}  # class
boko:bok{O}
imba:{I}mb{A}
ana:{A}n{A}  # child
ambĩrĩria:{A}mbĩrĩri{A}  # beginning
ndũ:nd{Ũ}  # nothing
tũmi:{T}ũm{I}  # reason
ũria:{Ũ}ri{A}  # problem
rumi:rum{I}  # curse
thama:tham{A}  # island
roto:rot{O}  # dream (nominalized)
ongo:{O}ng{O}  # head 
roko:{R}ok{O}  # morning
ndo:nd{O}  # thing

LEXICON Cl7
<n><cl7>:{NULL}

LEXICON NounRootCl9p10
bata:bat{A}
buku:buk{U}  # book
bembe:bemb{E}  # corn
gathĩ:gath{Ĩ}  # ladder
gui:gu{I}  # dog, plural category uncertain
nyamũ:nyam{Ũ}  # animal, plural category uncertain
cukuru:{C}ukur{U}  # school, plural category uncertain
ca:{C}{A}  # outside, plural category uncertain
kari:{K}ar{I}  # car, plural category uncertain
benjũ:benj{Ũ}  # pencil
timũ:{T}im{Ũ}  # lime
koma:{K}om{A}  # spirit, singular category uncertain
metha:meth{A}  # table
tũmĩrĩri:{T}ũmĩrĩr{I}  # message, plural category uncertain
thimũ:thim{Ũ}  # phone, plural category uncertain
thitembũ:thitemb{Ũ}  # stamp, plural category uncertain
bahaca:bahac{A}  # envelope, plural category uncertain
yama:yam{A}  # meat, plural category uncertain
gũkũ:gũk{Ũ}  # chicken, plural category uncertain
thaa:tha{A}  # hour
bakũri:bakũr{I}
dahi:dah{I}
thia:thi{A}
thĩ:thĩ  # not sure if this actually belongs here but it's my best guess based on agreement
tuma:{T}um{A}  # darkness
yoka:y{O}k{A}  # snake
goga:gog{A}  # grace
goro:gor{O}  # heart
guo:gu{O}  # garment
muoy{O}:muoy{O}  # life
tiihũ:{T}iih{Ũ}  # wave
tihũ:{T}ih{Ũ}  # wave
doo:do{O}  # bucket
nuthu:{N}uth{U}  # half
hĩndĩ:hĩnd{Ĩ}  # time (instance)
dagĩka:dagĩk{A}  # minute
bathi:bath{I}  # bus

LEXICON NounRootCl9p10Irr
rumu:rumu  # room
batĩ:bat{Ĩ}


LEXICON Cl9p10
<n><cl9p10>:{NULL}

LEXICON NounRootCl11p10
rũigi:{R}ũig{I}
gĩrĩ:gĩr{Ĩ}  # fence, plural category uncertain
imbo:{I}mb{O}  # song, plural category uncertain
ũĩ:{Ũ}{BLOCK}{Ĩ}  # river, plural category uncertain
ĩgĩ:{Ĩ}g{Ĩ}  # eagle, plural category uncertain
teto:tet{O}  # word
gano:gan{O}  # story 

LEXICON Cl11p10
<n><cl11p10>:{NULL}

LEXICON NounRootCl11p6
guoya:guoy{A}

LEXICON Cl11p6
<n><cl11p6>:{NULL}

LEXICON NounRootCl12p13
nua:nu{A}
ana:{A}n{A}  # child
ihũri:{I}hũr{I}  # gourd
hũa:hũ{A}  # coffee
hĩĩ:hĩ{Ĩ}  # boy
hiũ:hi{Ũ}  # knife
gui:gu{I}  # dog
hinda:hind{A}  # time (as in one time)

LEXICON Cl12p13
<n><cl12p13>:{NULL}

LEXICON NounRootCl14
wendi:wend{I}
cũrũ:{C}ũr{Ũ}  # porridge
goro:gor{O}  # expense
menyi:menyi  # information

LEXICON Cl14
<n><cl14>:{NULL}

LEXICON NounRootCl15
tũ:{T}{Ũ}
rug:{R}ug  # cook/cooking
theka:theka  # laugh
oko:{O}k{O}
gũrũ:gũr{Ũ}  # leg

LEXICON Cl15
<n><cl15>:{NULL}

PATTERNS
NounRootCl16
NounRootCl17
NounSg NounLocative
NounPl NounLocative
NounDimSg(1) NounSg NounDimSg(2) NounLocative
NounDimPl(1) NounPl NounDimPl(2) NounLocative
NounDimSg(1) NounSg-NoPre NounDimSg(2) NounLocative
NounDimPl(1) NounPl-NoPre NounDimPl(2) NounLocative

LEXICON NounRootCl16
ndũ<n><cl16><sg><def>:hand{Ũ}{NULL} # place

LEXICON NounRootCl17
ndũ<n><cl17><sg><indef>:kũnd{Ũ}{NULL}

LEXICON NounDimPl(2)
:{T}{Ũ} <dim>:{NULL}

LEXICON NounDimSg(2)
:{K}{A} <dim>:{NULL}

LEXICON NounNumberSg
<sg>:{NULL}

LEXICON NounNumberPl
<pl>:{NULL}

PATTERN NounSg
NumberCl1-Sg NounRootCl1 Cl1 NounNumberSg
NumberCl1Irr-Sg NounRootCl1Irr Cl1 NounNumberSg
NumberCl3-Sg NounRootCl3 Cl3 NounNumberSg
NumberCl5-Sg NounRootCl5 Cl5 NounNumberSg
NumberCl7-Sg NounRootCl7 Cl7 NounNumberSg
NumberCl9p10-Sg NounRootCl9p10 Cl9p10 NounNumberSg
NumberCl9p10Irr-Sg NounRootCl9p10Irr Cl9p10 NounNumberSg
NumberCl11p10-Sg NounRootCl11p10 Cl11p10 NounNumberSg
NumberCl11p6-Sg NounRootCl11p6 Cl11p6 NounNumberSg
NumberCl12p13-Sg NounRootCl12p13 Cl12p13 NounNumberSg
NumberCl14-Sg NounRootCl14 Cl14 NounNumberSg
NumberCl15-Sg NounRootCl15 Cl15 NounNumberSg

PATTERN NounSg-NoPre
NounRootCl1 Cl1 NounNumberSg
NounRootCl1Irr Cl1 NounNumberSg
NounRootCl3 Cl3 NounNumberSg
NounRootCl5 Cl5 NounNumberSg
NounRootCl7 Cl7 NounNumberSg
NounRootCl9p10 Cl9p10 NounNumberSg
NounRootCl9p10Irr Cl9p10 NounNumberSg
NounRootCl11p10 Cl11p10 NounNumberSg
NounRootCl11p6 Cl11p6 NounNumberSg
NounRootCl12p13 Cl12p13 NounNumberSg
NounRootCl14 Cl14 NounNumberSg
NounRootCl15 Cl15 NounNumberSg

PATTERN NounPl
NumberCl1-Pl NounRootCl1 Cl1 NounNumberPl
NumberCl1Irr-Pl NounRootCl1Irr Cl1 NounNumberPl
NumberCl3-Pl NounRootCl3 Cl3 NounNumberPl
NumberCl5-Pl NounRootCl5 Cl5 NounNumberPl
NumberCl7-Pl NounRootCl7 Cl7 NounNumberPl
NumberCl9p10-Pl NounRootCl9p10 Cl9p10 NounNumberPl
NumberCl9p10Irr-Pl NounRootCl9p10Irr Cl9p10 NounNumberPl
NumberCl11p10-Pl NounRootCl11p10 Cl11p10 NounNumberPl
NumberCl11p6-Pl NounRootCl11p6 Cl11p6 NounNumberPl
NumberCl12p13-Pl NounRootCl12p13 Cl12p13 NounNumberPl
NumberCl14-Pl NounRootCl14 Cl14 NounNumberPl
NumberCl15-Pl NounRootCl15 Cl15 NounNumberPl

PATTERN NounPl-NoPre
NounRootCl1 Cl1 NounNumberPl
NounRootCl1Irr Cl1 NounNumberPl
NounRootCl3 Cl3 NounNumberPl
NounRootCl5 Cl5 NounNumberPl
NounRootCl7 Cl7 NounNumberPl
NounRootCl9p10 Cl9p10 NounNumberPl
NounRootCl9p10Irr Cl9p10 NounNumberPl
NounRootCl11p10 Cl11p10 NounNumberPl
NounRootCl11p6 Cl11p6 NounNumberPl
NounRootCl12p13 Cl12p13 NounNumberPl
NounRootCl14 Cl14 NounNumberPl
NounRootCl15 Cl15 NounNumberPl

LEXICON NumberCl1-Sg
:m{Ũ}>
LEXICON NumberCl1-Pl
:{A}>

LEXICON NumberCl1Irr-Sg
:{NULL}>
LEXICON NumberCl1Irr-Pl
:{NULL}>

LEXICON NumberCl3-Sg
:m{Ũ}>
LEXICON NumberCl3-Pl
:m{Ĩ}>

LEXICON NumberCl5-Sg
:{RRI}{IRI}>
LEXICON NumberCl5-Pl
:m{A}>

LEXICON NumberCl7-Sg
:{K}{Ĩ}>
LEXICON NumberCl7-Pl
:{C}{I}>

LEXICON NumberCl9p10-Sg
:{N}{N2}{N3}>
LEXICON NumberCl9p10-Pl
:{N}{N2}{N3}>

LEXICON NumberCl9p10Irr-Sg
:{NULL}
LEXICON NumberCl9p10Irr-Pl
:{NULL}

LEXICON NumberCl11p10-Sg
:{R}{Ũ}>
LEXICON NumberCl11p10-Pl
:{N}{N2}{N3}>

LEXICON NumberCl11p6-Sg
:{R}{Ũ}>
LEXICON NumberCl11p6-Pl
:m{A}>

LEXICON NumberCl12p13-Sg
:{K}{A}>
LEXICON NumberCl12p13-Pl
:{T}{Ũ}>

LEXICON NumberCl14-Sg
:{NULL}
:{Ũ}
LEXICON NumberCl14-Pl
:m{A}>

LEXICON NumberCl15-Sg
:{K}{Ũ}>
LEXICON NumberCl15-Pl
:m{A}>

PATTERNS
IrregCopNoClass
IrregularCopula IrregularCopulaClass IrregularCopulaNumber

LEXICON IrregularCopula
rĩ<cop><pres><p3>:nĩ
rĩ<cop><pres><neg><p3>:ti

LEXICON IrregCopNoClass
rĩ<cop><pres><p1><sg>:ndĩ

LEXICON IrregularCopulaNumber
<sg>:{NULL}
<pl>:{NULL}

LEXICON IrregularCopulaClass
<cl1>:{NULL}
<cl3>:{NULL}
<cl5>:{NULL}
<cl7>:{NULL}
<cl9p6>:{NULL}
<cl9p10>:{NULL}
<cl11p6>:{NULL}
<cl11p10>:{NULL}
<cl12p6>:{NULL}
<cl12p13>:{NULL}
<cl14>:{NULL}
<cl15>:{NULL}
<cl16>:{NULL}
<cl17>:{NULL}

PATTERNS
CopVerbNeg1(1) CopPersNum(1) CopVerbTense CopVerbNeg1(2) CopPersNum(2)
CopVerbNeg1(1) CopPersNumNoNeg(1) CopVerbTense CopVerbNeg1(2) CopPersNumNoNeg(2)
CopPersNum(1) CopVerbNeg2(1) CopVerbTense CopVerbNeg2(2) CopPersNum(2)

LEXICON CopVerbNeg1(2)
:n{D}> <neg>:{NULL}
: :

LEXICON CopPersNumNoNeg(2)
:{Ũ}> <p2><sg>:{NULL}{NULL}
:{A}> <cl1><sg>:{NULL}{NULL}
:{Ũ}> <cl3><sg>:{NULL}{NULL}
:{yĨ}> <cl3><pl>:{NULL}{NULL}
:{Ĩ}> <cl9p6><sg>:{NULL}{NULL}
:{Ĩ}> <cl9p10><sg>:{NULL}{NULL}
:{Ũ}> <cl14><sg>:{NULL}{NULL}

LEXICON CopPersNum(2)
:{N}{N2}{N3}> <p1><sg>:{NULL}{NULL}
:{T}{Ũ}> <p1><pl>:{NULL}{NULL}
:m{Ũ}> <p2><pl>:{NULL}{NULL}
:m{A}> <cl1><pl>:{NULL}{NULL}
:r{Ĩ}> <cl5><sg>:{NULL}{NULL}
:m{A}> <cl5><pl>:{NULL}{NULL}
:{K}{Ĩ}> <cl7><sg>:{NULL}{NULL}
:{C}{I}> <cl7><pl>:{NULL}{NULL}
:m{A}> <cl9p6><pl>:{NULL}{NULL}
:{C}{I}> <cl9p10><pl>:{NULL}{NULL}
:{R}{Ũ}> <cl11p6><sg>:{NULL}{NULL}
:m{A}> <cl11p6><pl>:{NULL}{NULL}
:{R}{Ũ}> <cl11p10><sg>:{NULL}{NULL}
:{C}{I}> <cl11p10><pl>:{NULL}{NULL}
:{K}{A}> <cl12p6><sg>:{NULL}{NULL}
:m{A}> <cl12p6><pl>:{NULL}{NULL}
:{K}{A}> <cl12p13><sg>:{NULL}{NULL}
:{T}{Ũ}> <cl12p13><pl>:{NULL}{NULL}
:m{A}> <cl14><pl>:{NULL}{NULL}
:{K}{Ũ}> <cl15><sg>:{NULL}{NULL}
:m{A}> <cl15><pl>:{NULL}{NULL}
:ha>  <cl16><sg>:{NULL}{NULL}
:k{Ũ}> <cl17><sg>:{NULL}{NULL}

LEXICON CopVerbNeg2(2)
:{T}{I}> <neg>:{NULL}

LEXICON CopVerbTense
ri<cop><currpast>:{NULL}{U}ma{NULL}
rĩ<cop><pres>:{NULL}{Ĩ}
rĩ<cop><rempast>:{A}>{NULL}
rĩ<cop><nearpast>:r{A}>{NULL}
rĩ<cop><pres>:{NULL}{NULL}

PATTERNS
VerbInfImp(1) VerbStem VerbInfImp(2)
VerbFoc(1) VerbNeg1(1) VerbSubject(1) VerbWithTense VerbNeg1(2) VerbSubject(2) VerbFoc(2)
VerbFoc(1) VerbNeg1(1) VerbSubjectNoNeg(1) VerbWithTense VerbNeg1(2) VerbSubjectNoNeg(2) VerbFoc(2)
VerbFoc(1) VerbSubject(1) VerbNeg2(1) VerbWithTense VerbNeg2(2) VerbSubject(2) VerbFoc(2)

PATTERN VerbWithTense
VerbTenseAspect-A(1) VerbReflexive(1) VerbStem VerbTenseAspect-A(2) VerbSuffix VerbTenseAspect-A(3) VerbTrans VerbFinalVowel-A VerbReflexive(2)
VerbTenseAspect-E(1) VerbReflexive(1) VerbStem VerbTenseAspect-E(2) VerbSuffix VerbTenseAspect-E(3) VerbTrans VerbFinalVowel-E VerbReflexive(2)

LEXICON VerbInfImp(2)
:{NULL}> <imp>:{A}
:{K}{Ũ}> <inf>:{A}

LEXICON VerbFoc(2)
:n{Ĩ}> <foc>:{NULL}
: :

LEXICON VerbSubjectNoNeg(2)
:{Ũ}> <p2><sg>:{NULL}{NULL}
:{A}> <cl1><sg>:{NULL}{NULL}
:{Ũ}> <cl3><sg>:{NULL}{NULL}
:{Ĩ}> <cl3><pl>:{NULL}{NULL}
:{Ĩ}> <cl9p6><sg>:{NULL}{NULL}
:{Ĩ}> <cl9p10><sg>:{NULL}{NULL}
:{Ũ}> <cl14><sg>:{NULL}{NULL}

LEXICON VerbSubject(2)
:{N}{N2}{N3}> <p1><sg>:{NULL}{NULL}
:{T}{Ũ}> <p1><pl>:{NULL}{NULL}
:m{Ũ}> <p2><pl>:{NULL}{NULL}
:m{A}> <cl1><pl>:{NULL}{NULL}
:r{Ĩ}> <cl5><sg>:{NULL}{NULL}
:m{A}> <cl5><pl>:{NULL}{NULL}
:{K}{Ĩ}> <cl7><sg>:{NULL}{NULL}
:{C}{I}> <cl7><pl>:{NULL}{NULL}
:m{A}> <cl9p6><pl>:{NULL}{NULL}
:{C}{I}> <cl9p10><pl>:{NULL}{NULL}
:{R}{Ũ}> <cl11p6><sg>:{NULL}{NULL}
:m{A}> <cl11p6><pl>:{NULL}{NULL}
:{R}{Ũ}> <cl11p10><sg>:{NULL}{NULL}
:{C}{I}> <cl11p10><pl>:{NULL}{NULL}
:{K}{A}> <cl12p6><sg>:{NULL}{NULL}
:m{A}> <cl12p6><pl>:{NULL}{NULL}
:{K}{A}> <cl12p13><sg>:{NULL}{NULL}
:{T}{Ũ}> <cl12p13><pl>:{NULL}{NULL}
:m{A}> <cl14><pl>:{NULL}{NULL}
:{K}{Ũ}> <cl15><sg>:{NULL}{NULL}
:m{A}> <cl15><pl>:{NULL}{NULL}

LEXICON VerbNeg2(2)
:{T}{I}> <neg>:{NULL}

LEXICON VerbTenseAspect-A(3)
:{A}> <v><rempast>:{NULL} <hab>:>{A}g
:{BLOCK}{A}> <v><rempast>:{NULL} <hab>:>{A}g
:{R}{A}> <v><nearpast>:{NULL} <hab>:>{A}g
:{R}{A}> <v><nearpast>:{NULL} :{NULL}
:{BLOCK}{A}> <v><currpast>:{NULL} :{NULL}
:{K}{A}> <v><pres>:{NULL} :{NULL}
:{RAR}{A}> <v><pres>:{NULL} :{NULL}
:{RAR}{A}> <v><pres>:{NULL} <proc>:>{Ĩ}r
:{NULL} <v><pres>:{NULL} <hab>:>{A}g
:{K}{Ũ}> <v><currfut>:{NULL} :{NULL}
:{K}{A}> <v><remfut>:{NULL} :{NULL}
:{K}{Ĩ}> <v><seq>:{NULL} :{NULL}
:{K}{I}> <v><seq>:{NULL} :{NULL}
